Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.170

State general fund—Estimates for state support to public schools, from.

At such time as the governor shall determine under the provisions of chapter 43.88 RCW, the superintendent of public instruction shall submit such detailed estimates and other information to the governor and in such form as the governor shall determine of the total estimated amount required for appropriation from the state general fund for state support to public schools during the ensuing biennium.

[ 1980 c 6 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.41.040. Prior: 1945 c 141 s 11; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 4940-9. Formerly RCW 28A.41.040, 28.41.040.]

NOTES:

Severability—1980 c 6: See note following RCW 28A.515.320.